Hawaii, session 2026, SB3157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  Section 291C-161, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows: "(g) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, fines collected pursuant to chapter 291L and section 291C-108 shall be deposited into the automated speed enforcement systems program special fund established under section 291L-10 and shall be expended [in the county in which the fine was imposed,] for purposes that include the establishment, implementation, operation, oversight, management, maintenance, and repair of an automated speed enforcement system and implementation of the automated speed enforcement systems program." SECTION 2.  Section 291L-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The State shall establish and implement, in accordance with this chapter, an automated speed enforcement system imposing monetary liability on the registered owner of a motor vehicle for violations of section 291C-108.  The State shall provide for the: (1)  Procurement, location, and oversight of an automated speed enforcement system; and (2)  Installation, operation, maintenance, and repair of the automated speed enforcement system through a third-party contractor[.]; provided that the department may reissue procurement for the automated speed enforcement system every five years; provided further that this provision shall not apply to any contract for the operation of the automated speed enforcement systems program executed before July 1, 2026.  Upon the expiration of any contract, including all renewal terms exercised thereunder, any subsequent procurement and contract shall comply with the requirements of this section.  Where the automated speed enforcement system affects county property, the department shall cooperate with and assist the county as needed to install, maintain, and repair the automated speed enforcement system established pursuant to this chapter." SECTION 3.  Section 291L-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291L-10[]]  Automated speed enforcement systems program special fund; established.  (a)  There is established in the state treasury an automated speed enforcement systems program special fund to be administered by the department, into which shall be deposited all fines collected pursuant to this chapter and section 291C-108. (b) Moneys in the automated speed enforcement systems program special fund shall be expended by the department [in the county in which the fine was imposed,] for the establishment, implementation, operation, oversight, management, maintenance, and repair of an automated speed enforcement system and implementation of the automated speed enforcement systems program. (c) All unencumbered and unexpended moneys in excess of $12,000,000 remaining in the automated speed enforcement systems program special fund at the close of June 30 of each year shall lapse to the credit of the state general fund." PART II SECTION 4.  Section 291J-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291J-2[]]  Photo red light imaging detector systems program; established.  There is established the photo red light imaging detector systems program to enforce the traffic-control signal laws of the State, which may be implemented by the State or any county following completion of a pilot program in the city and county of Honolulu, on any state or county highways within the respective county[.]; provided that the photo red light imaging detector systems program shall be subject to the expansion limitations pursuant to section 291L-2(b).  Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to supersede or override any provision of chapter 291D." SECTION 5.  Section 291L-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291L-2[]]  Automated speed enforcement systems program; established.  (a)  There shall be established the automated speed enforcement systems program, which shall be implemented by the State to enforce the speed restriction laws of the State.  The automated speed enforcement [system] systems program shall be limited to [only those locations where a photo red light imaging detector system has been implemented pursuant to chapter 291J.] any county with a population of five hundred thousand or more and may be implemented in any high-risk location of a state or county highway as determined by the department based on an analysis of the studies conducted pursuant to section 291L-3(c). (b)  The expansion of the automated speed enforcement program and the photo red light imaging detector systems program established pursuant to chapter 291J shall be subject to the following limitations: (1)  The department shall implement new enforcement systems at not more than ten new locations per calendar year.  For the purposes of calculating this annual limit, a single location or intersection shall be counted as one location, regardless of whether it is equipped with an automated speed enforcement system, a photo red light imaging detector system, or both; and (2)  The department shall implement new enforcement systems at not more than two new locations within any single state senatorial district during any calendar year, utilizing the same counting method established in paragraph (1). (c)  The department may consult with the judiciary regarding implementation; provided further that the judiciary shall not control or delay the department's authority to determine camera locations or implementation timelines." PART III SECTION 6.  Section 291J-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "county" to read as follows: ""County" means [the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui, and the city and county of Honolulu.] any county having a population of five hundred thousand or more." PART IV SECTION 7.  If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.